Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1319
Funds of Department of Health and Human Services; use.

Funds of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be used to defray the reasonable expenses incurred in the recruitment, training, and recognition of foster care providers and volunteers, including expenses incurred for community forums, public information sessions, and similar administrative functions.

Laws 1990, LB 1222, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 199.